Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2683.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. PFC Stanley J. Lassak Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Stanley J. Lassak was born January 11, 1921, in Cresson.(2) PFC Lassak received education up until the eighth grade before going to work on the family farm.(3) Outside of work, PFC Lassak enjoyed spending time with family and gardening.(4) PFC Lassak entered the United States Army in September 1942. During his service, he became a Private First Class with the Medical Detachment of the 22nd Infantry Regiment and served until September 1945.123456789101112131415161718 (5) Throughout his service, PFC Lassak earned several awards and decorations, including the Purple Heart, Bronze Star Medal, European-African-Middle Eastern Campaign Medal and the Good Conduct Medal.(6) On December 5, 1993, PFC Lassak was struck and killed by a car on Level Road in Cresson Township in Cambria County.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 8612, carrying U.S. Route 22 in Cresson Township, Cambria County, as the PFC Stanley J. Lassak Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2683PN3738 - 2 - 123456789101112131415